Florida, session 2026, HB493.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 110.1185, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
110.1185 Administrative leave for living organ donation.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "living organ donor"
means a person who donates all or part of a human organ while he
or she is alive for transplantation into another person.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb493-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 493 2026
(2) Each state agency shall grant administrative leave,
with pay, not to exceed 30 working days, to allow an employee to
serve as a living organ donor. Administrative leave granted
under this section is in addition to any medical, personal, or
other leave otherwise authorized by law.
Section 2. Section 381.865, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
381.865 Leave for living organ donation by employees of
private employers and local governments.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Employer" means a private employer, including a sole
proprietor, partnership, corporation, limited liability company,
or other entity, or a political subdivision of the state, that
employs 50 or more employees.
(b) "Living organ donor" means a person who donates all or
part of a human organ while he or she is alive for
transplantation into another person.
(2)(a) An employer shall grant an employee an unpaid leave
of absence to allow the employee to serve as a living organ
donor if the employee submits a written request for such leave,
including written documentation from the attending physician
confirming the date of the donation. The leave shall continue
until the attending physician provides medical clearance for the
employee to resume work duties.
(b) The unpaid leave of absence granted pursuant to
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb493-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 493 2026
paragraph (a) is in addition to any medical, personal, or other
paid leave provided by the employer.
(c) An employer may grant paid or unpaid leave for a
period longer than required by paragraph (a).
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb493-01-c1